Florida, session 2026, SB702.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSection 394.4997, Florida Statutes, is created 23 to read: 24 394.4997âGun Violence Prevention Pilot Program.â 25 (1)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.âThe Legislature finds 26 that persons under 21 years of age in this state are 27 disproportionately affected by gun violence, which has 28 significant adverse effects on the health, safety, and well 29 being of persons under 21 years of age. Further, the Legislature 30 finds that mental health challenges and unresolved conflicts are 31 contributing factors to the prevalence of gun violence and that 32 there is a need for targeted mental health and conflict 33 resolution education programs to assist persons under 21 years 34 of age in mitigating these issues. It is the intent of the 35 Legislature to establish programs that provide mental health 36 services tailored to the needs of persons under 21 years of age, 37 implement conflict resolution training in schools and community 38 centers to prevent violence, and fund community-based 39 initiatives that address the root causes of gun violence among 40 persons under 21 years of age. 41 (2)âCREATION.â 42 (a)âIMPACT GNV of the City of Gainesville shall develop and 43 implement a Gun Violence Prevention Pilot Program in the City of 44 Gainesville, in collaboration with the Department of Juvenile 45 Justice, the state attorney, and the public defender of the 46 Eighth Judicial Circuit. 47 (b)âThe pilot program shall provide mental health services, 48 community-based intervention programs, conflict resolution 49 training, and alternative opportunities. 50 (c)âIMPACT GNV shall design the pilot program to align with 51 and complement existing efforts in the City of Gainesville to 52 address gun violence among youth and young adults. IMPACT GNV 53 shall, at a minimum, consult with stakeholders before and during 54 implementation of the pilot program. 55 (3)âELIGIBILITY.âIn order to become an eligible program 56 participant, he or she must be: 57 (a)âA person who is at least 10 to 21 years of age, who is 58 at moderate or high risk of being: 59 1.âA victim of gun violence; 60 2.âAn offender who has inflicted bodily harm or death; or 61 3.âAn individual returning to the community from a 62 delinquency residential program; or 63 (b)âA family member of a person eligible under paragraph 64 (a). 65 (4)âPROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.âThe program shall: 66 (a)âProvide program participants with access to mental 67 health services, including, but not limited to, all of the 68 following: 69 1.âIndividual therapy sessions with qualified professionals 70 or mental health counselors to address personal mental health 71 issues. 72 2.âFacilitated group therapy sessions to provide peer 73 support and shared experiences. 74 3.âFamily therapy sessions involving family members to 75 address familial issues contributing to mental health problems. 76 4.âTrauma-focused cognitive behavioral therapy for 77 participants who have experienced trauma. 78 5.âArt and music therapies to help participants express 79 emotions and cope with stress. 80 6.âSubstance abuse treatment programs addressing substance 81 abuse issues that may contribute to violent behavior. 82 7.âMediation training. 83 8.âRestoration of relationships. 84 9.âResilience and leadership skills. 85 (b)âIn collaboration with the Department of Juvenile 86 Justice, the state attorney, and the public defender for the 87 Eighth Judicial Circuit, provide program participants who are 88 involved with the delinquency system or on probation with 89 opportunities to obtain: 90 1.âA graduate equivalency degree. 91 2.âJob training, skills development, or an apprenticeship. 92 3.âEmployment at high-risk or critical need positions. 93 (5)âREFERRAL.â 94 (a)âThe public defenderâs office will receive referrals to 95 the dependency program. 96 (b)âThe state attorneyâs office will receive referrals to 97 the diversion program under part III of chapter 985. 98 (c)âThe Department of Juvenile Justice will receive 99 referrals to the class for firearm offenders under s. 100 985.601(11). 101 (6)âREPORTS.- 102 (a)âBeginning October 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, 103 the City of Gainesville, in collaboration with Alachua County, 104 shall report to IMPACT GNV and the Department of Juvenile 105 Justice the number of participants in the pilot program; data on 106 the impact on the rate of gun violence among individuals within 107 the age group and geographic area served by the program; data on 108 risk factors for gun violence in the geographic area served by 109 the program; feedback from program participants; and 110 recommendations for improvement and expansion of services based 111 on the results of the pilot program. 112 (b)âIMPACT GNV shall report to the Governor, the President 113 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 114 by December 31 of each year on the implementation and 115 performance of the program. 116 (7)âREPEAL.âThis section expires June 30, 2030. 117 Section 2.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 118 $500,000 is appropriated in nonrecurring funds from the General 119 Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families for the 120 purpose of implementing this act. 121 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.